Illinois, session 104th, SB2314.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Healthy Forests, Wetlands, and Prairies Act 5is amended by changing Section 20 as follows: 6    (525 ILCS 22/20)7    Sec. 20. Establishment of the Healthy Forests, Wetlands, 8and Prairies Grant Program. 9    (a) The Department of Natural Resources, subject to 10appropriation, shall establish and administer a Healthy 11Forests, Wetlands, and Prairies Grant Program to restore 12degraded forest lands and native prairies and to promote the 13growth of native vegetation that removes carbon dioxide from 14the atmosphere and helps mitigate the impact of climate 15change.16    (b) Entities that may apply to participate in the Healthy 17Forests, Wetlands, and Prairies Grant Program include:18        (1) State agencies and units of local government, 19    including, but not limited to, municipalities, townships, 20    counties, forest preserves, and park districts;21        (2) conservation land trusts;22        (3) not-for-profit entities with conservation 23    missions, including, but not limited to, climate change   SB2314 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10465 BDA 20540 b1    mitigation, preservation of natural lands, and 2    conservation of the State's natural resources; and3        (4) other entities that, because of their missions, 4    are determined by the Department to be eligible recipients 5    of the grants under this Act.6    (c) At least 75% of the moneys appropriated for the 7Healthy Forests, Wetlands, and Prairies Grant Program shall be 8awarded to the State agencies, units of local government, land 9trusts, and other entities that the Department determines are 10eligible for a grant under this Section. The Department may 11use an amount not to exceed 23% of the moneys appropriated for 12the Program for the purposes of restoring degraded forest 13lands and native prairies and to promote the growth of native 14vegetation that remove carbon dioxide from the atmosphere and 15help mitigate the impact of climate change. The Department may 16use an amount not to exceed 2% of the moneys appropriated for 17the Healthy Forests, Wetlands, and Prairies Grant Program for 18administrative costs associated with the Program.19    (d) The Department shall adopt any rules necessary for the 20implementation of this Act, including rules establishing 21requirements and timeframes for the submission of grant 22applications by entities that are authorized to apply to 23participate in the Healthy Forests, Wetlands, and Prairies 24Grant Program.25    (e) Grants provided under this Act may be used by eligible 26entities for the purpose of:   SB2314 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10465 BDA 20540 b1        (1) matching funds for federal or private dollars for 2    projects that forward the goal of climate change 3    mitigation through promotion of the management, planting, 4    maintaining, and preserving of native grasses, plants, and 5    trees; 6        (2) financing projects along roadways and in parks and 7    forest preserves on public or private lands to plant 8    native trees and prairie grasses demonstrated to absorb 9    carbon; 10        (3) financing projects that promote the stewardship of 11    existing public and private urban forests and natural 12    lands, including the removal of invasive or nonnative 13    plant species; 14        (4) funding regional teams tasked with planting native 15    prairie grasses and trees, prescribed burning for the 16    maintenance of natural lands, removing invasive plant 17    species, and educational outreach; and18        (5) promoting education and marketing regarding local 19    projects or steps community members may take to promote 20    the growth of native vegetation that removes carbon 21    dioxide from the atmosphere; and .22        (6) financing shoreline restoration and protection 23    projects on behalf of counties and park districts. 24(Source: P.A. 103-923, eff. 1-1-25.)